Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 2 Acquisition of Rights of Way and Easements for Federal Parkways

Cross references.

Limited access roads generally, §

32-6-110

et seq.

32-3-30.
Power of department to acquire rights of way and easements.

The department shall have the authority and is empowered to acquire, either by condemnation, purchase, gift, or other methods, rights of way and easements necessary to comply with the laws, rules, and regulations of the United States government for the construction of federal parkways in Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 604, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 982, § 1.

Cross references.

Easements generally, T. 44, C. 9.

32-3-31.
Method of acquisition.

The authority delegated by this article to the department to acquire rights of way and easements for federal parkways shall be the same authority as hereinbefore provided by law for the acquisition of rights of way for present or future public road or other transportation purposes in Georgia; and the department shall exercise such authority in the same manner and under the same Code sections which provide for the construction of state-aid roads in this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 604, § 2; Ga. L. 1969, p. 982, § 1.

32-3-32.
Acquisition of fee simple title; designation on official county map.

The rights of way acquired by the department may, at the option of the department, be a fee simple title; and the nature and extent of the rights of way and easements so acquired shall be designated upon an official county map showing the location of the rights of way across each county in this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 604, § 5; Ga. L. 1969, p. 982, § 1.

32-3-33.
Inclusion of scenic easements in rights of way.

The department may acquire scenic easements; and these may be included as part of the rights of way to be acquired by the department for federal parkways in those cases mutually acceptable to the department and the United States government or its appropriate agency.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 604, § 3; Ga. L. 1969, p. 982, § 1.

32-3-34.
Amount of land to be acquired for rights of way.

The lands and interest in lands to be acquired in fee simple for federal parkway rights of way shall average not more than 125 acres per mile plus not more than 25 acres per mile in scenic easements; and in no case shall the width of the fee simple rights of way for federal parkway land be less than 300 feet. It is the intent of this Code section that in using the acreage per mile method there will be permitted the balancing of the total acreage over the entire length of the federal parkway project within the state and that such usage will provide for flexibility to narrow or widen the fee simple lands acquired for federal parkways to meet specific conditions.

The variance of the width of the lands to be acquired by the department for federal parkways is to be dependent upon topographical conditions; requirements of federal parkway design; acquisition of acreage adjacent to the federal parkway at designated locations of scenic, historic, or recreational value or significance; simplicity and ease of rights of way acquisition; cost of rights of way acquisition; and other conditions considered by the department to be controlling; but in no case shall the width of the fee simple rights of way to be acquired for federal parkways be less than the 300 feet provided for in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 604, § 4; Ga. L. 1969, p. 982, § 1.

32-3-35.
Access for private roads.

The acquisition of rights of way by the department for federal parkways shall permit no reservations or interests of access for private roads connecting to or crossing the federal parkways; and the department shall acquire, as part of the rights of way for federal parkways, the rights and interests of access for private roads.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 604, § 7; Ga. L. 1969, p. 982, § 1.

32-3-36.
Conveyance of title to rights of way to United States government or its appropriate agency.

The department is authorized and empowered to convey such title or interest as is acquired for federal parkway rights of way to the United States government or its appropriate agency, free and clear of all claims for compensation.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 604, § 6; Ga. L. 1969, p. 982, § 1.

32-3-37.
Use of property before final condemnation; enforcement of Code section.

When areas of land or interests in land have been tentatively designated by the United States government to be included within federal parkways but the final survey and plans necessary for the construction of federal parkways as provided by law have not yet been made, no person shall cut or remove any timber from such areas as so designated pending the completion and finalization of such survey and plans after receiving notice from the department that such area is under investigation. Any property owner who suffers loss or damage by reason of the restraint upon his right to use the timber upon his land pending such investigation and the finalization of survey and plans for the construction of federal parkways shall be entitled to recover compensation from the department for the temporary appropriation of his property and for any damage to his property caused by such temporary appropriation, in the event the same is not finally included within the area designated as a federal parkway.

The provisions of this Code section may be enforced under the same law now applicable for the adjustment and payment of compensation in the acquisition of rights of way for present or future public road or other transportation purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 604, § 9; Ga. L. 1969, p. 982, § 1.

32-3-38.
Advertisement restrictions near parkways.

No advertisement or advertising structure shall be erected, constructed, installed, maintained, or operated within 500 feet of the boundary of any federal parkway rights of way acquired by the department under this article except as follows:

Advertisements which are securely attached to a place of business or residence which does not exceed one advertising structure with a total area not to exceed 100 square feet may be erected or maintained or caused to be erected or maintained by the owner or lessee of such place of business or residence within 150 feet of such place of business or residence if and only if the advertisement or advertising structure relates solely to merchandise, services, or entertainment sold, produced, manufactured, or furnished at such place of business or residence;

Signs may be erected or maintained or caused to be erected or maintained on any farm by the owner or lessee of such farm if and only if such signs relate solely to farm produce, merchandise, services, or entertainment sold, produced, manufactured, or furnished on such farm and when the signs so erected or maintained do not exceed two in number with a combined total area not to exceed 150 square feet;

Signs may be posted or displayed upon real property by the owner, or by the authority of the owner, stating that the property upon which the sign is located, or a part of such property, is for sale or rent; and such signs, when so posted or displayed, may state any data pertaining to such property and its appurtenances and the name and address of the owner and the agent of such owner;

Notice of any railroad, bridges, ferries, or other transportation or transmission company may be posted or displayed when found necessary in the discretion of the commissioner;

A sign containing 16 square feet or less and bearing an announcement of any county, town, village, or city, or historic place or shrine, which is situated in this state, advertising itself or local industries, meetings, buildings, or attractions, may be posted or displayed, provided that the sign is maintained wholly at public expense or at the expense of such historic place or shrine;

Historic markers erected by duly constituted and authorized public authorities may be posted or displayed; and

Highway markers and signs erected or caused to be erected by the commissioner or other authorities, in accordance with the law, may be posted or displayed.

Any person who violates the advertising restrictions of this Code section or any lawful regulation promulgated by the department under authority of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as provided in Code Section 32-6-91. The department is authorized to use the remedies set forth in Code Sections 32-6-93, 32-6-94, and 32-6-96, in order to enforce the advertising restrictions set forth in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 604, § 10; Ga. L. 1969, p. 982, § 1.

Cross references.

Control of advertising, informational, directional, and other signs generally, §

32-6-50

et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Granting, renewal, and revocation of permits for outdoor advertising, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations for the State of Georgia, Department of Transportation, Chapter 672-6 et seq.

32-3-39.
Concurrent jurisdiction conceded to United States government; taxing power of state reserved.

The State of Georgia, by this article, does concede concurrent jurisdiction to the United States government or its appropriate agency for rights of way and the lands or interest in lands conveyed to the United States government for federal parkway purposes under this article. However, the State of Georgia expressly reserves the taxing power as applied to all persons, property, or operations within the federal parkway rights of way except as applied to the property of and the operations of the United States government and its agencies.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 604, § 8; Ga. L. 1969, p. 982, § 1.